Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1716.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 24 O.S. 2021, Section 165, as
amended by Section 4, Chapter 406, O.S.L. 2025 (24 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 165), is amended to read as follows:
Section 165. A. A violation of the Security Breach
Notification Act that results in injury or loss to residents of this
state may be enforced by the Attorney General or a district attorney
in the same manner as an unlawful practice under the Oklahoma
Consumer Protection Act.
B. Except as provided in subsection D of this section, the
Attorney General or a district attorney shall have exclusive
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1716 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

auth ority to bring an action and may obtain actual damages for a
violation of the Security Breach Notification Act and a civil
penalty not to exceed One Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars
($150,000.00) per breach of the security of the system or series of
breaches of a similar nature that are determined in a single
investigation. Civil penalties shall be based upon the magnitude of
the breach, the extent to which the behavior of the individual or
entity contributed to the breach, and any failure to provide the
notice required by Section 163 of this title.
C. 1. An individual or entity that uses reasonable safeguards
and provides notice as required by Section 163 or 164 of this title
shall not be subject to civil penalties and may use such compliance
as an affirmative defense in a civil action filed under the Security
Breach Notification Act.
2. An individual or entity that fails to use reasonable
safeguards but provides notice as required by Section 163 or 164 of
this title shall not be subject to the civil penalty set forth in
subsection B of this section but shall be subject to actual damages
and a civil penalty of Seventy-five Thousand Dollars ($75,000.00).
3. A private entity shall not be liable in a class action
resulting from a breach of the security of a system unless such
breach was caused by the willful and wanton conduct or gross
negligence of the private entity.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1716 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

D. A violation of the Security Breach Notification Act by a
state-chartered or state-licensed financial institution shall be
enforceable exclusively by the primary state regulator of the
financial institution.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON TECHNOLOGY AND TELECOMMUNICATIONS
February 19, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED


















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1716 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)